Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 7 Bribery

11-7-1.
Bribery of juror or person exercising judicial function.

Every person who shall give any sum of money or any bribe, present, reward or unsecured loan, or any promise or security for any, to obtain or influence the opinion, judgment, verdict, sentence, report or award of any judge, justice of the peace, warden, juror, auditor, referee, arbitrator, master in chancery, or person summoned as a juror, in any matter or cause pending or to be tried before him or her alone or before him or her with others, shall be imprisoned not exceeding seven (7) years or be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-7-1

; P.L. 1990, ch. 95, § 1.

11-7-2.
Acceptance of bribe by juror or person exercising judicial function.

Every judge, justice of the peace, warden, juror, auditor, referee, arbitrator, master in chancery, or person summoned as a juror, who shall accept, receive, or agree for in any way any bribe, present, reward, or unsecured loan, to him or her offered, for the purpose of obtaining or influencing his or her opinion, judgment, verdict, sentence, report, or award in any matter or cause depending or to be tried before him or her alone or before him or her with others, shall be imprisoned not exceeding seven (7) years or fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

11-7-2

; P.L. 1990, ch. 95, § 1.

11-7-3.
Solicitation or acceptance of bribe by agent, employee, or public official.

No person in public or private employ, or public official shall corruptly accept, or obtain or agree to accept, or attempt to obtain from any person, for himself or herself or any other person, any gift or valuable consideration as an inducement or reward for doing or forbearing to do, or for having done or forborne to do, any act in relation to the business of his or her principal, master, employer, or state, city, or town of which he or she is an official, or for showing or forbearing to show favor or disfavor to any person in relation to the business of his or her principal, master, employer, or state, city, or town of which he or she is an official.

It shall not be a defense to a prosecution under this section that the person did not have the power or authority to perform the act or omission for which the reward or inducement was offered, solicited, accepted, or agreed upon.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1219, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

11-7-3

; P.L. 1991, ch. 139, § 1.

11-7-4.
Bribery of agent, employee, or public official.

No person shall corruptly give or offer any gift or valuable consideration to any person in public or private employ, or any public official as an inducement or reward for doing or forebearing to do, or for having done or forborne to do, any act in relation to the business of his or her principal, master, or employer, or the state, city, or town of which he or she is an official, or for showing or forbearing to show favor or disfavor to any person in relation to the business of his or her principal, master, employer, or state, city, or town of which he or she is an official.

It shall not be a defense to a prosecution under this section that the person did not have the power or authority to perform the act or omission for which the reward or inducement was offered, solicited, accepted, or agreed upon.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1219, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

11-7-4

; P.L. 1991, ch. 136, § 1.

11-7-5.
Penalty for violations.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of §

11-7-3

or

11-7-4

shall be deemed guilty of a felony, and shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or three times the monetary equivalent of the gift or valuable consideration, whichever is greater, or imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1219, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

11-7-5

; P.L. 1981, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 89, § 1.

11-7-6.
Civil liability for violating § 11-7-3 or 11-7-4.

Any person injured by any violation of the provisions of §

11-7-3

or

11-7-4

may recover from the person or persons inflicting the injury twice the amount of the injury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1219, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

11-7-6

.

11-7-7.
Repealed.

11-7-8.
Accepting bribe to obtain preferential military treatment.

Any person obtaining anything of value from a spouse, parent, or other blood relative of any citizen of this state in the armed forces of the United States or subject to the Military Selective Service Act, 50 U.S.C. App. § 451 et seq., by claiming that he or she has obtained, can or will obtain for that citizen any exception, deferment, promotion, leave, furlough, preference, change of duty or place of service or the like, shall be guilty of a felony, and upon conviction shall be imprisoned not less than five (5) nor more than twenty-five (25) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 58; P.L. 1943, ch. 1352, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-7-8

.

11-7-9.
Corruption of sports participant or official.

Whoever corrupts or attempts to corrupt a player, coach, manager, trainer, umpire, referee, or other person engaged in playing, arranging, staging, officiating at, or promoting any amateur or professional athletic game or contest or jai alai match to be played or held within the state of Rhode Island, or who corrupts or attempts to corrupt any owner, trainer, groom, jockey, racing official, or other person in any manner engaged in or connected with the running, officiating at or promoting any horse race or dog race run or to be run within the state of Rhode Island by giving, offering, or promising any gift or gratuity whatever, directly or indirectly, with intent to improperly influence the conduct of the person in the playing, running, or carrying out of any athletic game or contest or jai alai match or any horse race, or officiating at the game or contest, whether the offer, promise, gift, or gratuity is made at or away from the playing field, boxing or ice arena, race course or fronton, or other place where the athletic game, contest, or horse race is scheduled to take place with intent to improperly influence the conduct of the person in connection with the proper playing or promoting of the athletic game or contest or jai alai match or officiating at the game, contest or match, or the proper running or promoting of any horse race or dog race or officiating at any horse or dog race, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment of not more than seven (7) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2556, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-7-9

; P.L. 1981, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 24, § 3.

11-7-10.
Acceptance of bribe by sports participant or official.

Any player, coach, manager, official, or other person engaged in the playing, arranging, or promotion of any amateur or professional athletic game or contest or jai alai match or officiating at the game, contest or match, or any owner, trainer, groom, jockey, racing official or other person participating in any horse race or dog race or in any manner engaged in conducting, arranging, or promoting any horse race or officiating at any horse or dog race, who accepts any gift or gratuity, directly or indirectly, from any person who gives, offers, or promises any gift or gratuity with intent to improperly influence the conduct of the person in the arranging, holding, or playing of the athletic game or contest or jai alai match or officiating at the game, contest or match, or the running or promoting of the horse race or dog race or officiating at the horse or dog race, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment of not more than seven (7) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2556, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-7-10

; P.L. 1981, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 24, § 3.

11-7-11.
Bribery of witness.

Any person who shall corruptly give or offer to give any sum of money or any bribe, present, or reward, or any promise or security to obtain or influence the testimony of any witness to any crime or to induce the witness to absent himself or herself from, or otherwise avoid or seek to avoid appearing or testifying at, any hearing shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction shall be imprisoned for not more than seven (7) years, or fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both. Nothing in this section shall be construed to make an agreement between the victim and the defendant to dismiss a criminal charge unlawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 430, § 1.

11-7-12.
Failure to report corruption of sports participant or official.

Any person who knows or has reason to know that corruption of a player, coach, manager, trainer, umpire, referee, or other person engaged in playing, arranging, staging, officiating at, or promoting any amateur or professional athletic game or contest or jai alai match to be played or held within the state of Rhode Island, or any owner, trainer, groom, jockey, racing official, or other person in any manner engaged in or connected with the running, officiating at, or promoting any horse race or dog race run or to be run within the state of Rhode Island by giving, offering or promising any gift or gratuity whatever, directly or indirectly, with intent to improperly influence the conduct of the person in the playing, running or carrying out of any athletic game or contest or jai alai match or any horse race or dog race has taken place in his or her presence or that any attempt to corrupt that person has taken place in his or her presence shall immediately notify the state police or the police department of the city or town in which the corruption or attempt to corrupt has taken place. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 24, § 4.

11-7-13.
Acceptance of gratuity by employees of banking division of department of business regulation.

No person who is an employee of the banking division of the department of business regulation or an employee of the department with jurisdiction over the banking division, shall accept a gratuity from a financial institution governed by title 19 or from any officer, director, or employee of the financial institution.

If the gratuity, so accepted, is valued at less than one hundred dollars ($100), the person who violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned for not more than one year, or fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

If the gratuity, so accepted, is valued at one hundred dollars ($100) or more, or if the aggregate of the gratuities so accepted within a year equal or exceed one hundred dollars ($100), the person who violated this section shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned not more than three (3) years, or fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or three (3) times the amount of the gratuity so given, whichever is greater, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 140, § 1.

11-7-14.
Offer of gratuity by employees of financial institutions.

No person who is an officer, director, or employee of a financial institution governed by title 19 shall give any gratuity to any individual who is an employee of the banking division of the department of business regulation, or to any employee of the department with jurisdiction over the banking division.

If the gratuity, so accepted, is valued at less than one hundred dollars ($100), the person who violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

If the gratuity, so accepted, is valued at one hundred dollars ($100) or more or if the aggregate of the gratuities, so accepted, within a year equals or exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), the person who violated this section shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned not more than three (3) years, or fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or three (3) times the amount of the gratuity so given, whichever is greater, or both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 467, § 1.